Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 32
IDAHO COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER GRANT PROGRAM

Sec.

§ 39-3201. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho Community Health Center Grant Program.”

§ 39-3202. Community health center grant fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund known as the “Community Health Center Grant Fund.” Subject to appropriation by the legislature, moneys in the fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of grants for community health centers in order to improve access to health care services for Idahoans and to provide for the administration of grants pursuant to this chapter.

§ 39-3203. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Applicant” means an entity submitting documents required by the community health center grant program for the purpose of requesting a grant from the community health center grant fund.

“Application period” means the time period from July 1 to August 30 of the state fiscal year for which funding is requested.

“Approval” means written notification that the application will be awarded funding through the community health center grant fund.

“Board” means the health care access grant review board, as established in section 39-5904, Idaho Code.

“Community health center” or “CHC” means a nonprofit organization or county-based governmental entity that:

Provides comprehensive primary and preventive medical services and provides or makes referrals for dental and mental health services;

Provides outpatient services to persons who are uninsured or have medicaid coverage without regard to a person’s ability to pay, provided that a minimum of twenty-five percent (25%) of such persons served by the organization or entity are uninsured;

Charges for services using a sliding fee schedule based upon income and family size; and

Is governed by a community-based board.

“Community health center grant” means a grant awarded pursuant to this chapter.

“Community health center grant program” means the program that administers the community health center grant fund.

“Department” means the department of health and welfare.

“Director” means the director of the department of health and welfare.

“Grant period” means the time period from July 1 through June 30 (state fiscal year) for which funding is granted.

§ 39-3204. Scope of grant support.

The board may award grants, in accordance with the procedures and criteria in this chapter, to community health centers for the purpose of improving access to health care services.

Individual grant awards will be limited to a total of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for direct and indirect costs, per year.

No project may be funded for more than a total of one (1) year.

In addition to other uses as approved by the board, funds awarded under a grant may be used for the purchase, construction, renovation or improvement of real property or for projects which are solely or predominantly designed for the purchase of equipment, including information technology and electronic health records.

§ 39-3205. Application required.

A completed community health center grant application must be submitted by the applicant for the purpose of requesting a grant on or before the conclusion of the application period specified for the appropriate grant cycle.

Each application shall include:

Identification of geographical area to be served;

Individual or entity requesting funds;

Narrative description of the community health needs and the methods to be used to address such needs and demonstrate the potential of the project to improve patient health outcomes and access to health care services in the community;

Identification of measurable goals, objectives and patient health outcomes to be used to reach the goals, and the resources necessary to complete each activity;

Estimation of how long it will take to accomplish the individual activities of the project;

Demonstrated community support for the project;

Proposed project budget including:

A line item budget with a brief description of each expense category, including any anticipated operating expenses, capital and equipment or contract expenses;

Documentation of one (1) or more vendor price quotes for all proposed equipment purchases;

Contact person for verification of fiscal information; and

Federal tax identification number.

All applications must include the required information.

The grant application and any attachments submitted by the applicant shall be the primary source of information for awarding a grant.

§ 39-3206. Grant award schedule.

The board shall conduct the grant process in accordance with the following schedule:

The director shall develop an application form in conformance with section 39-3205, Idaho Code, and make guidance available no later than July 1 which shall initiate the application period.

The completed application shall be submitted no later than August 30 of the application period.

The board shall issue notification to every applicant regarding the disposition of their grant request by October 30 of the grant period.

Funds for approved grants shall be disbursed during November of that grant period or over the course of the current grant year as funds become available.

§ 39-3207. Award criteria.

The board shall award grants based on the following weighted criteria:

Background of applicant organization. The applicant must show adequate experience, knowledge, and qualifications to adequately perform the scope of work: weight = 15%;

Community support. The applicant must demonstrate community support for the project: weight = 10%;

Specificity and clarity of scope of project. The proposal will be evaluated based upon demonstrated need and the extent to which the goals and objectives are specific, measurable, and relevant to the purpose of the proposal and the activities planned to accomplish those objectives are germane and can be sustained beyond the grant time frame: weight = 30%;

Monitoring and evaluation. The proposal will be evaluated based on the extent to which the monitoring and evaluation system will document program progress, or improved patient health outcomes if applicable, and measure effectiveness: weight = 15%;

Budget. The proposal will be evaluated based on the extent to which a detailed itemized budget and justification are consistent with stated objectives and planned program activities: weight = 20%;

Geographical community health center equity. The board shall consider the geographical distribution of past grant awards and shall endeavor to meet community health centers’ needs in an equitable manner statewide: weight = 10%.

§ 39-3208. Fraudulent information on grant application.

Providing false information on any application or document submitted under this chapter is a misdemeanor and grounds for declaring the applicant ineligible. Any and all funds determined to have been acquired on the basis of fraudulent information must be returned to the community health center grant fund. This section shall not limit other remedies which may be available for the filing of false or fraudulent applications.

§ 39-3209. Administrative appeals.

Applicants aggrieved by the award or failure to award a grant pursuant to this chapter shall be afforded the remedies provided in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.